apertium-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="væd/de__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>      <r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>der</l>     <r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>     <r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dede</l>    <r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>det</l>     <r>de<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dende</l>   <r>de<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>det</l>     <r>de<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>det</l>     <r>de<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dede</l>    <r>de<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dede</l>    <r>de<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bræk/ke__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>      <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ker</l>     <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kes</l>     <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kede</l>    <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>     <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kende</l>   <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>     <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>     <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kede</l>    <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kede</l>    <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="kys/se__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>      <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ser</l>     <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ses</l>     <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sede</l>    <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>     <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sende</l>   <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>     <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>     <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sede</l>    <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sede</l>    <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="g/ide__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ider</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ides</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idet</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idende</l>     <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idet</l>         <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idet</l>         <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idede</l>        <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idede</l>        <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="f/ise__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>          <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ise</l>        <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iser</l>       <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ises</l>       <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>      <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eset</l>       <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isende</l>     <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eset</l>         <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eset</l>         <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esne</l>        <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esne</l>        <r>ise<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="tør/re__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rer</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>res</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rede</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rende</l>     <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <p><l>ret</l>         <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>         <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rede</l>        <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rede</l>        <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>




<pardef n="rul/le__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lede</l>      <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lende</l>     <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>         <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>         <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lede</l>        <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lede</l>        <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="afpasse">            <i>afpas</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afplukke">           <i>afpluk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afrydde">            <i>afryd</i><par n="væd/de__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afspille">           <i>afspil</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afstresse">          <i>afstres</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bagsnakke">          <i>bagsnak</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="belæsse">            <i>belæs</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="besmykke">           <i>besmyk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blokke">             <i>blok</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blusse">             <i>blus</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="borttrylle">         <i>borttryl</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brodde">             <i>brod</i><par n="væd/de__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brække">             <i>bræk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dresse">             <i>dres</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dryptørre">          <i>dryptør</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dukke">              <i>duk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dusse">              <i>dus</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="finstille">          <i>finstil</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fise">               <i>f</i><par n="f/ise__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flække">             <i>flæk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forgasse">           <i>forgas</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forpasse">           <i>forpas</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forstyrre">          <i>forstyr</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fortrylle">          <i>fortryl</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forvirre">           <i>forvir</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fosse">              <i>fos</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frysetørre">         <i>frysetør</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gide">               <i>g</i><par n="g/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="græsse">             <i>græs</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hakke">              <i>hak</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hulle">              <i>hul</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indstille">        <i>indstil</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="interesse">         <i>interes</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="irre">              <i>ir</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klække">            <i>klæk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="knurre">            <i>knur</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ligestille">         <i>ligestil</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lodde">              <i>lod</i><par n="væd/de__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lufttørre">          <i>lufttør</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="messe">              <i>mes</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mukke">              <i>muk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="opstille">           <i>opstil</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="passe">              <i>pas</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pirre">              <i>pir</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prakke">             <i>prak</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prelle">             <i>prel</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="redde">              <i>red</i><par n="væd/de__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rulle">              <i>rul</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rydde">              <i>ryd</i><par n="væd/de__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="samtykke">           <i>samtyk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skurre">             <i>skur</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skylle">             <i>skyl</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sparre">             <i>spar</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="specialtilpasse">    <i>specialtilpas</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spidde">             <i>spid</i><par n="væd/de__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spække">             <i>spæk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stirre">             <i>stir</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="surre">              <i>sur</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="takke">              <i>tak</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tilfredsstille">     <i>tilfredsstil</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tirre">              <i>tir</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tosse">              <i>tos</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tulle">              <i>tul</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="udrydde">            <i>udryd</i><par n="væd/de__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="udtørre">            <i>udtør</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="underspille">        <i>underspil</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undertrykke">        <i>undertryk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="virre">              <i>vir</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vædde">              <i>væd</i><par n="væd/de__vblex"/></e>
